Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Educational and Vocational Programs for Parents

205.702.
Educational and vocational programs for parents receiving public assistance — Reports by cabinet.

The cabinet shall take all necessary actions to ensure that parents receiving public assistance may engage in educational and vocational programs where assessment shows their chances of achieving self-sufficiency will improve.

The cabinet shall file quarterly progress reports and an annual report with the Legislative Research Commission and the Interim Joint Committee on Health and Welfare documenting the results of the cabinet’s efforts to enable parents receiving public assistance to participate in activities to achieve self-sufficiency. The annual report shall identify the number and proportion of parents, compared to the previous state fiscal year and the last full year of activity under the Job Opportunities and Basic Skills Program who:

Participated in each type of educational, vocational training, or work activity, including post-secondary education;

Successfully completed educational or vocational programs;

Earned income due to work activity, including work study programs, while receiving public assistance;

Became ineligible for public assistance due to increases in earnings; and

Became ineligible for public assistance for other reasons, including but not limited to penalties or expiration of time limits.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 236, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

205.703.
Educational and vocational programs eligible for supportive services — Prohibition against discontinuance of service to low income parents except under certain circumstances.

The cabinet shall honor parents’ requests to volunteer for basic, secondary, post-secondary, and vocational education programs, including work study and internships; where:

The activity is:

Countable toward federal work participation rates; or

Combined with work activity countable toward federal work participation rates;

The activity is made part of a self-sufficiency plan in which it will lead to achievement of a specific employment goal;

The parent meets admission criteria for the educational program; and

The parent does not already have marketable skills sufficient to achieve at least two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty threshold, adjusted by household size.

The cabinet shall honor parents’ requests to continue current educational activities as defined under subsection (1) of this section, where the parent is making good and satisfactory progress based on standards normally applied by the educational or vocational programs to enrollees.

The cabinet shall inform all parents receiving public assistance of the option to engage in educational and vocational training activities, as defined under subsection (1) of this section, and receive supportive services:

At least once per year, no less than six (6) weeks prior to the start of fall semester of the state university and community college system;

During the initial and any subsequent self-sufficiency planning process;

During conciliation in which the parent requests a change in placement; and

At any time upon request of the parent.

The cabinet shall not require a parent who is currently participating in an education program to discontinue participation and shall not discontinue supportive services for education under subsection (1) of this section, except where:

The parent is no longer making good or satisfactory progress;

The parent fails to verify satisfactory attendance under standards normally applied by the educational program to enrollees;

The parent in a noncountable education activity fails to participate in the additional required countable activity;

The parent refuses an offer of employment paying at least two-hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty threshold, adjusted for household size; or

The parent becomes ineligible for public assistance for reasons unrelated to educational activity.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 236, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

205.704.
Preparation and submission of strategic plan to further education of low income parents — Parties included in planning process.

The cabinet shall undertake a joint planning process with appropriate state, local, and private education institutions, interested agencies, and citizens to ensure that opportunities for low income parents to continue or improve their education shall continue with the implementation of the public assistance program funded by federal block grant dollars under Title IV-A of the Federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. secs. 602 et seq. To this end, by July 31, 1998, the cabinet shall convene and provide staff services for an advisory group of interested parties to evaluate opportunities and strategies and make recommendations for continued participation by low income parents in education activities, including, but not limited to, representatives of:

The state university system;

The state community college system;

Private colleges and universities;

State vocational and technical schools;

The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority;

Basic and secondary education programs, including literacy, adult basic education, a High School Equivalency Diploma program, and high school programs;

Advocacy and citizens groups representing low income parents, including low income parents in sufficient number to represent at least one quarter (1/4) of the total group;

Providers of child care and other supportive services; and

Two (2) members each from the Senate, as appointed by the President of the Senate, and the House of Representatives, as appointed by the Speaker of the House.

The cabinet shall prepare a strategic plan for continuation of education opportunities for low income parents, based on the recommendations of the advisory group. The cabinet shall submit the plan to the Legislative Research Commission and the Interim Joint Committee on Health and Welfare no later than July 31, 1999. At a minimum, the plan shall set forth strategies, including any funding necessary, to:

Create work study opportunities; and

Increase the access to child care funding.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 236, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2017 ch. 63, § 27, effective June 29, 2017.

205.705.
Legislative intent regarding child support statutes.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that requirements relating to child support or paternity established by KRS Chapters 205, 403, 405, 406, and 407 shall be in compliance with the provisions of 42 U.S.C. secs. 651 et seq.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 255, § 38, effective July 15, 1998.